Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Statewide System of Forest Fire Protection

149.510.
Definitions for KRS 149.510 to 149.600.

As used in KRS 149.510 to 149.600, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Secretary” means the secretary for energy and environment;

“Cabinet” means the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

“Timberland” means any land which has enough timber or woody brush, standing or down, to constitute a fire menace to itself or adjoining lands, but does not include lands under cultivation or entirely in grass, nor land that is an isolated fire risk unless a fire on it would imperil the lands of an adjoining landowner.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 1, effective June 19, 1958; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 164, effective July 15, 2010.

149.520.
Establishment of statewide system of forest fire prevention.

It shall be the duty of the cabinet to establish and maintain a statewide system of forest fire prevention, detection and suppression.

The cabinet shall formulate a plan and program subject to the approval of the secretary for energy and environment to extend forest fire protection to all counties not now participating in the state program. The plan shall provide for the establishment of such protection in all the counties of the state on or before January 1, 1964.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 2, effective June 19, 1958; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, §§ 1, 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 165, effective July 15, 2010.

149.530.
Termination of voluntary county participation — Notice to nonparticipating counties. [Repealed.]

149.540.
County payments to statewide system — Power to require owners to participate — Adjustments in acreage.

After January 1, 1959, all counties receiving state forest fire protection and all counties having received notice of the intended establishment of such service shall annually pay to the cabinet a sum equivalent to two cents ($0.02) per acre of privately owned timberlands according to the most current United States Forest Service Survey of Kentucky subject to additions and deductions of acreage since the making of such study. Such payments shall be due and payable on September 15 following the assessment.

Contributions may be met out of the general funds of the county and in addition the fiscal court may require each owner of timberland in the county to participate directly by paying into a special county forest fire protection fund an assessment not exceeding three cents ($0.03) per year for each acre of timberland of which he is the owner.

In any case in which the cabinet and the governing body of any county cannot agree upon the additions or deductions to privately owned forest acreage in a particular county, or to changes in forest acreage from year to year, the question shall be submitted to the judge of the Circuit Court of the county by a summary and informal proceeding, and a decision of the judge, certified to the governing body and to the cabinet respectively, shall be conclusive and final.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 4; 1966, ch. 23, § 49; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 161, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 142, § 10, effective July 15, 1982.

149.550.
County assessment rate — Owners’ duties.

If the county governing body requires the owners to participate, it shall determine the amount of the assessment for each acre, and shall order the assessment to be paid into the county treasury by the owners of all timberland located in the county.

It shall be the duty of each owner of timberland situated in the county to list or have listed such property with the property valuation administrator within the time provided for assessing property for state and county ad valorem taxes.

Timberland shall be listed by the owner of the first freehold estate therein, and it shall be listed without reference to conflicting title. The listing shall be made at the same time and in the same manner in which declarations of real property owned are made with the property valuation administrator for assessment purposes. If the owner fails to list the timberland, the property valuation administrator shall list it. The property valuation administrator shall have the power to swear witnesses in order to ascertain the person in whose name to make the list.

All persons in whose name the timberland acreage is properly listed shall remain bound for the assessment, notwithstanding they may have sold or parted with it.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 5; 1974, ch. 308, § 31.

149.560.
Tax roll record of timberland acreage.

The property valuation administrator shall include on the regular property tax roll an accurate record of the acreage of timberland listed in the name of each owner in the county.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 6, effective June 19, 1958.

149.570.
Computation of timberland assessment — Delivery of tax bills.

When the property tax rolls are delivered to the county clerk by the property valuation administrator, as required by law, the county clerk shall compute the assessment due the county from each owner of timberland in accordance with the rate fixed by the county governing body and the amount of timberland acreage indicated on the property tax roll.

The computation shall be made on the regular tax bills in such manner as may be directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.

The county clerk shall deliver these bills to the sheriff for collection as provided in KRS 133.220(3).

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 7, effective June 19, 1958; 2005, ch. 85, § 566, effective June 20, 2005.

149.580.
Collection of timberland assessment.

The sheriff shall collect the assessment at the same time and in the same manner in which he or she collects the state and county ad valorem tax. He or she shall issue a receipt to the taxpayer, report to the county judge/executive, and make his or her annual and final settlements with the fiscal court at the same time and in the same manner provided by law for his or her report and settlement of county and state taxes.

Such assessments shall become due and payable on the date, and subject to the same discounts, delinquency date, and penalties provided in KRS 134.015 for state, county, and district taxes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 8, effective June 19, 1958; 1978, ch. 384, § 287, effective June 17, 1978; 2009, ch. 10, § 63, effective January 1, 2010.

149.590.
County forest fire protection fund.

A separate fund shall be maintained by the county treasurer to be known as the county forest fire protection fund. The assessments collected from each timberland owner, together with penalties, shall constitute the fund and it shall be used only for making payments to the cabinet in accordance with provisions of KRS 149.540.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 9, effective June 19, 1958; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3).

149.600.
Appeal from listing of property as timberland.

Any person aggrieved by a listing of any portion of his property as timberland by the property valuation administrator may file a protest with the county judge/executive, provided the protest is in writing and is made within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice of the listing. Protest may be made on the ground that the land or any portion so listed is not timberland, or that the timberland so listed will not be benefited by the forest fire protective system then in effect, or benefited by the proposed forest fire protective system if the assessment is being made for the first time in that county.

The county judge/executive shall hear all protests properly filed. Protests shall be heard within a reasonable time after the filing thereof, and reasonable notice shall be given to the protestant and the secretary for energy and environment as to the time and place of the hearing. The county judge/executive shall have authority to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of any witness desired by any interested party, and he shall be authorized to administer the oath to any witness.

Proceedings for hearing any protest shall be summary and the findings of the county judge/executive shall be final, and an order shall be entered either dismissing the protest or directing the proper county officials to alter their records in accordance with the findings.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 139, § 10, effective June 19, 1958; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 166, effective July 15, 2010.